Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-7711
Department; maintain copies of agreements; notice of termination, filing required.

The department shall maintain on file a copy of all cooperative agreements for which certificates of public advantage remain in effect. Any party to a cooperative agreement who terminates the agreement shall file a notice of termination with the department within thirty days after termination.

Laws 1994, LB 1223, § 121.